Wyoming, session 2026, SF0094.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 1-39-125 is created to read:

1-39-125. Liability; roadway reconstruction and
maintenance.
SF0094

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0413

(a) Upon a person satisfying the conditions specified
in subsection (b) of this section, a local government is
liable for damages caused by:

(i) The failure to reconstruct any bridge,
culvert, highway, roadway, street, alley, sidewalk or
parking area; or

(ii) The failure to maintain, including
maintenance necessary to compensate for weather conditions,
any bridge, culvert, highway, roadway, street, alley,
sidewalk or parking area.

(b) To establish damages under subsection (a) of this
section, a claimant shall establish all of the following:

(i) A bridge, culvert, highway, roadway, street,
alley, sidewalk or parking area was in need of
reconstruction or maintenance so significant that a
reasonable person would foresee the likelihood of damage or
injury to persons and objects using the bridge, culvert,
highway, roadway, street, alley, sidewalk or parking area;
SF0094

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0413

(ii) The local government received notice of the
need for the reconstruction or maintenance of a bridge,
culvert, highway, roadway, street, alley, sidewalk or
parking area before the claimant's damages occurred. For
purposes of this paragraph, the notice of the need for the
reconstruction or maintenance shall be provided to the
local government in writing;

(iii) The local government failed to take
reasonable steps within a reasonable time after receiving
notice under paragraph (ii) of this subsection to provide
for the reconstruction or maintenance of the bridge,
culvert, highway, roadway, street, alley, sidewalk or
parking area. For purposes of this paragraph, reasonable
steps include, but are not limited to:

(A) The development of blueprints, surveys
or other plans for the reconstruction or maintenance;

(B) The entry of a contract or agreement by
the local government to provide for the reconstruction or
maintenance;
SF0094

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0413

(C) The commencement of the reconstruction
or maintenance of the bridge, culvert, highway, roadway,
street, alley, sidewalk or parking area.

(iv) The claimant suffered damages to the
claimant's person or property caused by the failure to
reconstruct or maintain the bridge, culvert, highway,
roadway, street, alley, sidewalk or parking area.

Section 2. W.S. 1-23-107(a), 1-39-104(a),
1-39-118(f)(intro), 1-39-120(a)(intro), 18-2-111 and
18-3-513(b) are amended to read:

1-23-107. Individual liability of members of
governmental agencies.

(a) Notwithstanding W.S. 1-39-101 through 1-39-120
and 1-39-125, the members of any governmental board,
agency, council, commission or governing body are not
individually liable for any actions, inactions or omissions
by the governmental board, agency, council, commission or
governing body.
SF0094

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0413

1-39-104. Granting immunity from tort liability;
liability on contracts; exceptions.

(a) A governmental entity and its public employees
while acting within the scope of duties are granted
immunity from liability for any tort except as provided by
W.S. 1-39-105 through 1-39-112 and 1-39-122 through
1-39-124 1-39-125. Any immunity in actions based on a
contract entered into by a governmental entity is waived
except to the extent provided by the contract if the
contract was within the powers granted to the entity and
was properly executed and except as provided in W.S.
1-39-120(b). The claims procedures of W.S. 1-39-113 apply
to contractual claims against governmental entities.

1-39-118. Maximum liability; insurance authorized.

(f) The liability imposed by W.S. 1-39-105 through
1-39-112 and 1-39-125 may include liability for property
damage in an amount less than five hundred dollars
($500.00) in cases in which no personal injury or death
resulted, but only under the following conditions:
SF0094

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0413

1-39-120. Exclusions from waiver of immunity.

(a) The liability imposed by W.S. 1-39-106 through
1-39-112 and 1-39-125 does not include liability for the
state or for any agency of the state for damages caused by:

18-2-111. Judgment against county to be paid by tax
levy; when execution to issue.

Except as provided in W.S. 1-39-101 through 1-39-120 and
1-39-125 when a judgment is rendered against the board of
county commissioners or any county officer the judgment
shall be paid by a tax levied for that purpose and when
collected shall be paid by the county treasurer to the
judgment creditor upon the delivery of a proper voucher.
Execution may issue on the judgment if payment is not made
within sixty (60) days after the time required for the
payment of county taxes to the county treasurer.

18-3-513. Appeal on disallowance of claim.

SF0094

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0413
(b) When the appeal is perfected, the clerk of the
board shall immediately give notice to the county attorney.
The clerk shall make a brief return of the proceedings
before the board with the decision properly certified and
file the same together with the bond and all papers in the
case in his possession with the clerk of the district
court. The appeal shall be entered, tried and determined
and costs awarded the same as appeals from circuit courts.
This section does not apply to claims under W.S. 1-39-101
through 1-39-120 and 1-39-125.

Section 3. This act shall apply to all claims arising
out of transactions or occurrences that occur on and after
July 1, 2026.

Section 4. This act is effective July 1, 2026.

(END)
SF0094